North Dakota statutes. TITLE 21 Governmental Finance
CHAPTER 21-03 Bonds
21-03-09.
Initial resolution — Form.

Proceedings for the issuance of bonds under the authority of this chapter must be instituted by the adoption of an initial resolution therefor. Such initial resolution must state:

The maximum amount of bonds proposed to be issued.

The purpose for which they are proposed to be issued.

The assessed valuation of all taxable property in the municipality as defined in section 21-03-01.

The total amount of bonded indebtedness of the municipality.

The amount of outstanding bonds of the municipality issued for a similar purpose.

Any other statement of fact deemed advisable by the governing body or voters proposing the same.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 7, subs. a; 1931, ch. 195, § 2, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 21-0309; S.L. 1971, ch. 249, § 7; 1971, ch. 251, § 3; 1987, ch. 73, § 7.

21-03-10.
Initial resolution — How adopted.

The initial resolution may be:

Adopted by a majority vote of the governing body at any regular meeting thereof or at any special meeting of which notice has been given as required by law, without any previous action thereon or request therefor by the qualified electors or property owners.

Proposed by filing a copy thereof in the office of the auditor or secretary of the municipality, together with a petition signed by qualified electors of the municipality aggregating in number one-fourth of the number of qualified electors of the municipality, as shown by the pollbook for the last preceding annual or general election held therein, or if such pollbook was not kept, then as shown by a census of the qualified electors of such municipality verified by the affidavit of one of such petitioners. Such petition must ask that an election on the question of issuing such bonds be called. Upon the filing of such proposed initial resolution and petition, the governing body shall call such election in the manner specified by section 21-03-11.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 7, subss. b, c; R.C. 1943, § 21-0310; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 44; 1985, ch. 235, § 49.

21-03-10.1.
School districts — Use of bond funds.

The initial resolution or petition providing for the issuance of bonds, whether adopted by a majority vote of the school board of a school district or proposed by the qualified electors of the school district as provided for in section 21-03-10, may, within the discretion of those proposing such initial resolution or petition, provide for a specific school plan for which the proceeds of the bond issue must be exclusively used except as otherwise provided in section 21-03-42. Such plan must designate the general area to be served by expenditure of bond proceeds for school purposes. The area intended to be served must be described in the plan, but need not be described in the bond election ballot.

A bond election ballot form in substantially the form prescribed in section 21-03-13 must be used in a school district bond election. After approval of the initial resolution by the number of qualified electors required by section 21-03-07, the proceeds of the bond issue may be used only for the purpose and in the manner designated by the school plan except as herein provided.

After approval of the bond issue, no change may be made in the purpose of expenditure of the bond proceeds except that, upon a favorable vote of sixty percent of the qualified electors residing in any specific area intended to be served as provided in subsection 1, material changes may be made in such plan as it affects said area to the extent such changes do not conflict with contractual obligations incurred.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 203, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 50; 2015, ch. 181, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

21-03-11.
Elections — When and how called and held.

Upon or after the adoption of an initial resolution by the governing body, or at the first meeting of the governing body held after the filing of a petition and proposed initial resolution by the qualified electors as specified in subsection 2 of section 21-03-10, the governing body by resolution shall provide for submitting to the qualified electors of the municipality the question whether the initial resolution shall be approved. The date of the election must be not less than twenty days after the passage of the initial resolution by the governing body or in the filing of a sufficient petition therefor by the qualified electors. The governing body shall designate the date of the election, the polling hours, and polling place, which must be the same as for municipal elections therein, and shall appoint an inspector, two judges, and two clerks of election for each polling place. In case of the absence of any election official, or the official’s inability to act at the opening of the polls, the remaining election officials for the polling place shall appoint a qualified elector to fill the vacancy. The election must be conducted and the returns thereof made and canvassed as in the case of elections of members of the governing body of the municipality.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 21-0311; S.L. 1967, ch. 190, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 51; 2013, ch. 169, § 7.

21-03-12.
Notice of election to be given.

The auditor, secretary, or similarly acting officer, by whatever name designated, of the municipality shall give notice of election by causing a notice thereof to be published once each week for at least two weeks prior to the date thereof in the official newspaper of such municipality, if any, or if it has none, in any newspaper published therein, or if no newspaper is published therein, then by posting copies of such notice in five public places in the municipality. The date of such posting or first publication must be at least fifteen days before the date of such election, exclusive of the day of such posting or first publication. Such notice must specify the date, polling hours, and polling places of such election and must contain a complete copy of the initial resolution and a statement that the question to be submitted thereat shall be whether said initial resolution shall be approved. If said question is to be submitted at a municipal election, the notice herein prescribed may be separate from the notice of such municipal election and may refer to the notice of such municipal election for the designation of polling places.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 9; R.C. 1943, § 21-0312; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 45.

21-03-13.
Ballot — Contents.

The ballot for a bond election must be separate from other ballots used on the same day for other elections, and must be written or printed, and must state the question in substantially the following form:

Shall the (here inserting the name of the municipality) issue its bonds in the amount of not to exceed $, (here inserting the amount) maturing within a maximum of , (here inserting the duration) resulting in an estimated additional millage of (here inserting the number of mills) mills, equal to $ (here inserting the equivalent in dollars) on each $1,000 of taxable valuation for the first taxable year, for the purpose of (here inserting the purpose)? Yes • No •

Click to view

Spoiled or blank ballots cast at such election may not be counted for or against the proposed issue.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 21-0313; 2015, ch. 181, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

21-03-14.
Bonds issued without an election.

Proceedings for the issuance of bonds under this chapter, if no election is required, must be instituted by a resolution of the governing body containing the facts required for an initial resolution as prescribed by section 21-03-09. At or after the adoption of the resolution, the governing body may proceed to sell, issue, and deliver the bonds as hereinafter provided for the sale, issuance, and delivery of bonds.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 11, R.C. 1943, § 21-0314; S.L. 1989, ch. 292, § 1.

21-03-15.
Direct, annual, irrepealable tax.

The governing body of every municipality issuing bonds under the authority of this chapter, before the delivery thereof, shall levy by recorded resolution or ordinance a direct, annual tax which, together with any other moneys provided by, or sources of revenue authorized by, the legislative assembly, shall be sufficient in amount to pay, and for the express purpose of paying, the interest on such bonds as it falls due, and also to pay and discharge the principal thereof at maturity. The municipality shall be and continue without power to repeal such levy or levies or to obstruct the collection of any such tax until such payments have been made or provided for, except that if the governing body in any year makes an irrevocable appropriation to the sinking fund of moneys actually on hand, or if there is on hand in the sinking fund an amount that would be sufficient to retire the bonds, the governing body shall cause its recording officer to certify the fact and amount to the county auditor with the direction that the county auditor should reduce by the amount so certified the amount otherwise to be included in the tax rolls next thereafter prepared. A copy of such resolution or ordinance must be certified to and filed with the county auditor, and after the issuance of such bonds, any such tax on property from year to year must be carried into the tax roll of the municipality and collected as other property taxes are collected. No further annual levy for that purpose is necessary. The governing body may, in its discretion and in anticipation of the sale of bonds, at any time after the issuance of bonds has been authorized by the electors or by resolution of the governing body when no election is required, levy and certify to the county auditor for collection a portion of the tax herein required, which must be credited against the amount otherwise required to be levied after the bonds have been sold. Any other tax or source of revenue authorized by the legislative assembly for such purposes and imposed or pledged by the municipality for those purposes is likewise irrepealable and subject to the same conditions and limitations as any taxes levied on property for the same purposes. Any annual or periodic amounts provided for the municipality issuing such bonds by the legislative assembly out of state funds for paying the interest and principal of such bonds constitute an irrepealable and continuing appropriation until the liability for all interest and principal payments of the bonds have been satisfied. When insufficient funds are available to pay the matured bonds, the county auditor shall notify the governing body of such municipality of such deficiency and the governing body thereupon may levy a direct tax on the taxable property to pay said deficiency and interest thereon. If the governing body of the issuing municipality no longer exists, the county auditor shall levy a direct tax against the taxable property in the original issuing municipality to pay said deficiency and the interest thereon. The manner of levy, certification, and collection of said tax must be the same as provided by this section for the levy, certification, and collection of taxes by this section. When such bonds are further sustained by revenue of a revenue-producing utility, industry, or enterprise, said resolution or ordinance may provide that the tax to be levied and assessed may be reduced by such amount and under such conditions as must be determined in said resolution or ordinance so long as adequate provision is always made for the payment of such bonds and interest thereon.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 12; 1935, ch. 199, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0315; S.L. 1947, ch. 193, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 21-0315; S.L. 1961, ch. 196, § 1; 1965, ch. 183, § 7; 1971, ch. 251, § 4; 1997, ch. 223, § 1.

21-03-16.
Authority to borrow and issue bonds — When complete.

Every municipality which has first complied with all requirements prescribed for and made applicable to it by this chapter, but not otherwise, may borrow money and issue and sell its municipal bonds to the amount and for the purpose or purposes specified in the initial resolution.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 13; 1931, ch. 195, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 21-0316.

21-03-17.
Record of proceedings.

Every municipality shall provide and keep a record book in which its auditor or secretary shall record a full and correct statement of every step or proceeding had or taken in the course of authorizing and issuing municipal bonds, including a statement of the affirmative and negative votes cast by the electors.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 21-0317; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 46.

21-03-18.
Form and contents of bonds.

Every municipal bond must be a negotiable instrument payable to bearer, or to bearer or the registered owner, with or without interest coupons attached, interest to be payable annually or semiannually at the rate or rates specified in the accepted bid for the purchase of said bonds. Each bond must specify the time and place for payment of the principal and interest, and must be numbered consecutively with the other bonds of the same issue, which must begin with number one and continue upward, or if so directed by the governing body, must begin with any other number and continue upward. Each bond must bear upon its face a name indicative of the purpose of the issue specified in said initial resolution and must contain a certificate or recital of any direct, annual, irrepealable tax which has been levied by the municipality upon all the taxable property therein, together with any other tax or source of revenue which the municipality may be authorized to impose or pledge and any annual or periodic payments or distributions appropriated or allocated by the legislative assembly, sufficient to pay the interest when it falls due, and also to pay and discharge the principal of such bond at maturity, and may contain any other statement of fact not in conflict with said initial resolution. The entire issue may be composed of a bond or bonds of a single denomination or of two or more denominations.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 15, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0318; S.L. 1965, ch. 183, § 2; 1971, ch. 251, § 5; 1977, ch. 214, § 1.

21-03-19.
Bonds — Terms.

Bonds issued under this chapter must be authorized by resolution, bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, be subject to redemption with or without premium, and be subject to such other terms or conditions as in the judgment of the municipality are in the public interest of the municipality, and must provide that the last installment of principal falls due not more than twenty years from the date of the bonds. The requirements of this section apply to each new issue of bonds, or if so determined by the governing body, to the bonds of a new issue combined with all of the outstanding bonds of one or more designated issues of bonds previously issued and similarly payable from taxes or other sources of revenues, or both, as the case may be.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 15, subs. 2; 1931, ch. 194, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0319; S.L. 1971, ch. 251, § 6; 1983, ch. 280, § 1.

21-03-20.
Interest — Ceases at maturity unless presented for payment.

All bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter must contain a provision that interest thereon ceases at maturity unless the holder thereof presents the same for payment and payment is refused.

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 177, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0320.

21-03-21.
Execution of bonds.

Municipal bonds must be executed in the name of and for the municipality issuing them, by its qualified officers, who for that purpose shall sign the same by manual or facsimile signatures in their official capacities, as follows:

For a county, the chairman of the board of county commissioners and the county auditor.

For a city, the mayor or president of the board of city commissioners and the city auditor.

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 285.

For any other municipality, the chairman or president of the governing board and the clerk or secretary thereof, or such other officer as the governing body thereof may determine.

The interest coupons attached to such bonds may be executed by the lithographed or engraved facsimile signature of such officers. The validity of every bond so executed remains unimpaired by the fact that any subscribing officer has ceased to be such officer before delivery to the purchaser. Bonds issued by a municipality having an official seal need not be sealed with such seal. The city auditor, county auditor, clerk, or secretary or such other officer as the governing body of the municipality may determine shall sign an endorsement on the back of each bond certifying that the bond is issued pursuant to law and is within the debt limit of the municipality issuing the bond.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 16; 1935, ch. 194, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0321; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 285; 1973, ch. 80, § 6; 1993, ch. 239, § 3.

21-03-21.1.
Attorney general to give opinion on legal sufficiency of investments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 239, § 9.

21-03-22.
Recording of bonds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 239, § 9.

21-03-23.
Bond record.

The county auditor shall keep a bond record in which must be entered, as to each issue of bonds issued by a taxing district in the county, a record of the date of issuance, the aggregate amount issued, the date of maturity of each bond, the rate of interest, the amount of the levy on taxable property for each year certified by the taxing board, the amount levied on any other object of taxation by the municipality, the amount pledged or allocated from other sources of revenue of the municipality, and the amount of any annual or periodic payments or distributions appropriated or allocated by the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 9; 1925 Supp., § 2079b9; S.L. 1943, ch. 105, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0323; S.L. 1965, ch. 183, § 3; 1979, ch. 187, § 31; 1985, ch. 282, § 2.

21-03-24.
Destruction of bonds not sold within three years.

All bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter which are not delivered to the purchaser and paid for within three years of their date must be canceled. The registering and certifying officer, in the presence of at least two electors of the municipality which authorized their issuance, shall destroy such bonds by the burning thereof, and with such witnesses shall make and file in the records of that officer’s office an affidavit as to the bonds so destroyed and the time and place of such destruction. The officer also shall make a record thereof in a proper book of record in that officer’s office. A copy of such affidavit must be filed with the auditor or secretary of the municipality which authorized their issuance.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 16; 1935, ch. 194, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0324; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 47.

21-03-25.
Bonds — Advertised for bids — Exception.

A municipality may not sell or enter any contract for the sale of any issue of its bonds authorized by this chapter in an amount exceeding one million dollars, for whatever purpose issued, without first advertising for bids in the manner prescribed by section 21-03-26, except as provided in section 21-03-30, and except that bonds issued under the authorization of subdivision g of subsection 2 of section 21-03-06 with the consent of the warrant holders, may be exchanged for matured warrants or matured interest coupons of warrants of the special improvement fund having the deficiency on account of which such bonds are being issued, without such advertising. The par value and accrued interest of the bonds so delivered may not exceed the par value and accrued interest of the warrants and interest coupons, and accrued interest thereon, for which they are exchanged.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 17; 1929, ch. 170, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 21-0325; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 48; 1971, ch. 249, § 8; 2019, ch. 203, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

21-03-26.
Bonds — Call for bids — How advertised.

A notice calling for bids for each proposed issue of municipal bonds must be published at least once in the official newspaper of the municipality, or, if the municipality does not have an official newspaper, then in the county’s official newspaper, not less than ten days nor more than thirty days before the date specified therein for the receiving of such bids. Such notice may be in any form but must specify the amount of bonds offered for sale and the date of the maturity thereof. Failure to publish such notice does not impair the validity of such bonds but renders unenforceable any executory contract entered into for the sale thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 17; R.C. 1943, § 21-0326; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 49; 1975, ch. 106, § 214; 1975, ch. 220, § 1; 1977, ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 375, § 2; 1993, ch. 239, § 4.

21-03-27.
Bids — Where received — Record.

The notice must specify the time and place at which bids will be received. The place where bids shall be received must be fixed by the governing board and may be within or outside the state. At the time and place specified, the governing board of the taxing district must be represented by one of its officials, or by the county auditor or some other person acting at the request of the board, who shall receive competitive bids, whether submitted orally or in writing. When the bids are received, the county auditor, auditor, secretary, or other person acting at the request of the board shall enter in a permanent record the amount and rate of interest of each bid and the name and address of the bidder.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 17, subss. 3, 4; R.C. 1943, § 21-0327; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 50; 1993, ch. 239, § 5.

21-03-27.1.
Sealed bids.

The governing body of any municipality calling for bids for the purchase of municipal bonds, as provided in sections 21-03-26 and 21-03-27, may in its discretion determine, and may state in the notice calling for such bids, that only sealed bids shall be received and considered.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 184, § 1.

21-03-28.
Bids — Accompanied by draft — Sale to best bidder — Rejection of all bids.

All bids must be accompanied by a certified check, cashier’s check, surety bond, or bank draft, in the amount of not less than one percent of the bid. After all bids have been received, they must be delivered forthwith to the governing body of the municipality, which shall award the sale of such bonds to the bidder who agrees to purchase them upon the terms most favorable to the municipality, unless the governing body determines to reject all bids. The governing body has the right to reject any and all bids. If no bids are received or if all bids received are rejected, the governing body may, without readvertising the bonds for sale, negotiate the sale of all of the bonds to any person upon terms complying with those specified in the notice of sale theretofore published, and if bids were rejected, more favorable to the municipality than those specified in a rejected bid. No sale may be for less than ninety-eight percent of the par value of such bonds plus the interest accrued on the bonds to the date of the delivery thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 17, subs. 3; R.C. 1943, § 21-0328; S.L. 1969, ch. 376, § 2; 1971, ch. 251, § 7; 1993, ch. 239, § 6.

21-03-29.
Unlawful for official to accept compensation from bidder.

No auditor, secretary, or other official of a municipality may accept, from a bidder or prospective bidder at a sale of bonds, a commission or any other compensation for the official’s services rendered or to be rendered in connection with the issuance, sale, or delivery of such bonds.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 17, subs. 5; R.C. 1943, § 21-0329; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 51.

21-03-30.
Municipal bonds — Private sale to United States or state agencies.

The procedure prescribed in this chapter relative to calling for bids upon the sale of municipal bonds is not required in the case of bonds issued under the authorization of subdivision b or c of subsection 7 of section 21-03-06, or in case bonds are sold to:

The state board of university and school lands.

The Bank of North Dakota.

The public finance authority.

Trust funds administered by public officials.

The United States of America, or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 17, subs. 6; 1935, ch. 198, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0330; S.L. 1947, ch. 194, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 21-0330; S.L. 1981, ch. 274, § 1; 1989, ch. 292, § 2; 2005, ch. 89, § 27.

21-03-31.
Notice to state or state departments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 239, § 9.

21-03-32.
Departments prohibited from purchasing bonds at higher prices within five years. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 239, § 9.

21-03-33.
Penalty for noncompliance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

21-03-34.
Registration of ownership of bonds — How made.

The holder of any bond payable to “bearer or registered owner”, as authorized by section 21-03-18, issued by any municipality, may have the ownership thereof registered as to the principal thereof by the county auditor, or in the case of a municipality of over four thousand population, by the auditor or secretary of the municipality issuing the same, or such other officer as the governing body of the municipality may determine. Registration by such officers must be made in the bond register and must be noted on the bond.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 18, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0334; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 53.

Cross-References.

Registration of state bonds by treasurer, see N.D.C.C. § 54-11-08.

21-03-35.
Effect of registration — Discharge therefrom.

After registration of a municipal bond as provided in section 21-03-34, no transfer thereof is valid unless made on the records of the county auditor or the records of the municipality by the registered owner in person, or by the registered owner’s duly authorized attorney, and similarly noted on the bond, but the same may be discharged from registration by being transferred in like manner to bearer, and thereafter transferability by delivery is restored, but such bond again from time to time may be registered or transferred to bearer as before. Such registration, however, does not affect the negotiability of the appurtenant coupons, but every such coupon continues to be transferable by delivery only and must remain payable to bearer.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 18, subs. 2; R.C. 1943, § 21-0335.

21-03-36.
Money borrowed or payable to be lawful money of United States.

All money borrowed by municipalities and all money received in payment of any tax levied in accordance with this chapter is lawful money of the United States, and all municipal bonds must be payable in such money.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 19, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0336.

21-03-37.
Appointment of fiscal agents.

The governing body of any municipality indebted on account of outstanding municipal bonds is authorized in its discretion to appoint a fiscal agent located in some city within or without the state, or if deemed convenient, one such agent, in each of two cities. Every such fiscal agent must be an incorporated bank or trust company authorized by the laws of the United States or of the state in which it is located to do a banking or trust company business. The custodian of the sinking funds of the municipality, when necessary, shall deposit with such fiscal agent such sums of money as are required for the payment of the principal or interest of municipal bonds.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 19, subs. 2; R.C. 1943, § 21-0337.

21-03-38.
Bond proceeds — Kept in separate fund — Protection of purchaser.

All borrowed money must be paid into the treasury of the municipality borrowing it, must be kept there until used, in a fund separate and distinct from all other funds, to be used for the purpose for which it was borrowed and for no other purpose except that such funds may be temporarily invested in securities as are approved by the governing board in accordance with the provisions of section 21-03-43 and as otherwise provided by section 21-03-42, and may be withdrawn only upon order or warrants made payable out of said fund and expressing the purpose for which they were drawn. The purchaser of any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter is not obliged to see to the application of the purchase price thereof, but is protected fully in paying for such bonds by the receipt of the county treasurer or of the officer delivering such bonds. Income from the temporary investing of receipts from bond issues must be available for use for such purpose as such bond issue was approved or, upon resolution of the governing body of the municipality, must be paid into the sinking fund for use in payment of bonds issued.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 19, subs. 3; R.C. 1943, § 21-0338; S.L. 1961, ch. 197, § 1; 1995, ch. 54, § 14.

21-03-38.1.
Disposal of bond proceeds.

The proceeds of any municipal bond sale, which have not been used for the purpose issued within three years after date of issue, may be disposed of by the governing body of the municipality as follows:

Sufficient funds must be transferred to the sinking fund of the issue in an amount equal to the principal of bonds outstanding and the interest requirements.

The governing body may, by a two-thirds vote of all its members, transfer the funds to any or all other debt sinking funds of the municipality.

The governing body, upon approval by a majority vote of the qualified electors, voting on the question at an election called therefor, may use the funds for some other purpose authorized by law.

If any funds remain, they must be transferred to the general fund of the municipality.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 171, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 21-03381; S.L. 1981, ch. 275, § 1; 1997, ch. 108, § 11.

21-03-39.
Ancillary contract authorized.

After any municipality has provided, as required by section 21-03-16, for an issue of bonds for a lawful purpose which can be accomplished only through performance of an executory contract by some other contracting party, such contract may be entered into before the actual execution or sale of the bonds with like effect as if the necessary cash for payments on the contract already were in the treasury.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 19, subs. 4; R.C. 1943, § 21-0339.

21-03-40.
Sinking funds — Custodian.

The city auditor, park district treasurer, or business manager of the school district or similarly acting officer of the respective municipality is custodian of each of its sinking funds, unless the governing body by resolution appoints the county treasurer.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 8; 1925, ch. 197, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2079b8; S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 20; 1931, ch. 202, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0340; S.L. 1965, ch. 185, § 1; 1967, ch. 191, § 3; 1975, ch. 144, § 21; 1993, ch. 239, § 7.

21-03-41.
Sinking funds — Duty of county treasurer.

When the county treasurer is custodian of any sinking fund, the county treasurer may not remit to the treasurer of the taxing district any taxes levied or any other moneys received for the purpose of paying the interest on or retiring the principal of bonds issued, but the county treasurer shall retain the same in a separate special fund maintained as a sinking and interest fund for the bonds of such taxing district. The county treasurer shall make quarterly reports to the treasurer of the taxing district whose sinking fund the county treasurer possesses, showing all collections and amounts added to each such fund, all payments made from such fund, and the net balance in each such fund from time to time. The county treasurer shall keep the sinking funds of each taxing district on deposit in such public depository as may have furnished proper bond therefor and as may have been designated by the governing board of the taxing district. When a sinking fund is so deposited, the county treasurer is relieved of personal responsibility for its safekeeping.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 326, § 8; 1925, ch. 197, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2079b8; S.L. 1931, ch. 202, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0341; S.L. 1965, ch. 183, § 4.

21-03-42.
Sinking fund — Sources and uses.

The sinking fund must be disbursed by the county treasurer or treasurer of the municipality, as the case may be, upon the directions therefor by resolution of the governing body of the municipality issuing such bonds. As such bonds mature, the county treasurer, upon warrant drawn upon the county treasurer by the county auditor, shall apply such sinking fund in retirement thereof, and also in payment of the interest thereon as it becomes payable. The county auditor shall draw such warrants so as to pay the interest and retire the bonds at as early a date as possible. If the bonds are retired or if the balance in the sinking fund is sufficient to retire the bonds, the county auditor shall notify the governing body of the municipality of its obligation under section 21-03-15 to terminate the levy for payment of principal and interest on the bonds. The county treasurer or treasurer of the municipality may not disburse any of such fund contrary to the provisions of this chapter, even though so directed by such governing body. The county treasurer or treasurer of the municipality may disburse such fund for the purpose of paying the principal and interest, or either, of the bonds for which such fund was created without any authorization therefor by the governing body. The sinking fund of each bond issue must be kept separate and must be designated by a name indicative of the issue of bonds on account of which it was created. The sources of such fund must be:

All moneys accruing to the borrowed money fund prescribed by section 21-03-38 which at any stage are not needed for the purpose for which the money was borrowed, and any moneys becoming applicable to the sinking fund must be transmitted by the treasurer of the municipality to the county treasurer, in case such municipality has a population of four thousand or less, upon direction therefor by the governing body of the municipality.

All moneys raised by taxation and received from other sources pursuant to section 21-03-15 for the purpose of paying said bond.

Moneys derived from licenses or other sources, the expenditure of which is not otherwise provided for by law, as the governing body may elect to place in the sinking fund, and which must be paid over to the county treasurer for deposit in such sinking fund by the treasurer of the municipality, in case such municipality has a population of four thousand or less, upon a resolution directing such payment by the governing body.

The premium, if any, for which the bonds have been sold over and above the par value and accrued interest.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 20, subs. 1; 1931, ch. 202, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0342; S.L. 1965, ch. 183, § 5; 1997, ch. 223, § 2.

21-03-43.
Investment of sinking funds.

Taking care that enough cash is retained always in the sinking fund to provide for annual payments of principal and interest, the surplus, if any, may be loaned or invested under the direction of the proper governing body as follows:

In the outstanding bonds for the payment of which the sinking fund is required, at any price not exceeding the principal, accrued interest, and a premium of not to exceed two years’ interest on such bonds.

In interest-bearing bonds of the United States, or of the state of North Dakota, or of any municipality as defined in section 21-03-01.

In conformity with the provisions of chapter 21-04.

Investments of the class specified in subsection 2 continue a part of the sinking fund and must be held in custody of the treasurer of the municipality. Bonds representing such investments may be sold by the governing body at any time, but the money received remains, until used, a part of the sinking fund.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 20, subss. 2, 3; R.C. 1943, § 21-0343.

21-03-44.
Sinking fund — Use for unauthorized purpose.

Money may not be withdrawn from a sinking fund and appropriated to any purpose other than the purpose for which the fund was instituted until that purpose has been accomplished, except as authorized by section 6-09.4-23 and sections 21-03-42 through 21-03-45.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 20, subs. 4; R.C. 1943, § 21-0344; S.L. 1999, ch. 86, § 3.

21-03-45.
Sinking fund — Surplus placed in general fund.

Any surplus in a sinking fund after all of the bonds for the payment of which the fund was created have been paid and canceled and after all investments of the second and third class finally have been disposed of or realized upon, must, within two years, be placed in the general fund of the municipal treasury.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 20, subs. 5; R.C. 1943, § 21-0345; S.L. 1993, ch. 242, § 1.

21-03-46.
Municipalities in more than one county.

When in this chapter a county officer is required to take any action with reference to the bond issues or sinking funds of any municipality of such county, if such municipality is situated partly within one county and partly within another or others, the governing body of such municipality by ordinance or recorded resolution shall designate the county whose official shall act in such capacity. In such case, collection of taxes levied in accordance with this chapter in any county wherein a portion of such municipality is situated must be transmitted and delivered to the custodian of the sinking fund of the municipality so specified by the governing body.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 21; R.C. 1943, § 21-0346.

21-03-47.
Limitation of action.

No action may be brought or maintained in any court in this state questioning the validity of any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, or of any tax levied pursuant hereto, unless such action has been commenced within thirty days after the adoption of the resolution of the governing body awarding the sale of such bonds.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 22; R.C. 1943, § 21-0347; S.L. 1977, ch. 216, § 1.

21-03-48.
Penalty for diversion of sinking and interest funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

21-03-49.
Penalty for diversion of borrowed money fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.